Illinois, session 104th, HB2629.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. References to Act. This Act may be referred to 5as the Transportation Choices Act. 6    Section 5. The Department of Transportation Law of the 7Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by adding 8Section 2705-204 as follows: 9    (20 ILCS 2705/2705-204 new)10    Sec. 2705-204. Transportation planning and greenhouse gas 11reduction. 12    (a) The General Assembly finds that:13        (1) Article XI of the Illinois Constitution provides 14    that the public policy of the State and the duty of each 15    person is to provide and maintain a healthful environment 16    for the benefit of this and future generations. 17        (2) The transportation sector is now the largest 18    source of greenhouse gas emissions in the State. 19        (3) The State has previously set a goal to have an 20    electric power sector that is free of greenhouse gas 21    emissions by 2045. 22        (4) Greenhouse gas pollution resulting from the   HB2629- 2 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1    production, distribution, and use of motor vehicle fuels 2    produces many social costs, including, but not limited to, 3    adverse public health impacts, increased heat waves, 4    droughts, water supply shortages, flooding, biodiversity 5    loss, and forest health issues, such as forest fires. 6        (5) The Illinois State Climatologist is projecting 7    that, by the end of the 21st Century, average daily 8    temperatures in the State will increase between 4 and 9 9    degrees Fahrenheit under a lower emissions scenario and 10    between 8 and 14 degrees Fahrenheit under a higher 11    emissions scenario. 12        (6) Climate change of such speed and magnitude will 13    result in heat stress on animals, plants, and workers; 14    reduced crop yields from short-term and rapid-onset 15    drought; increased pestilence; and other challenges that 16    will adversely affect the State's agriculture sector.17        (7) Increases in flooding, heat, and other factors 18    associated with climate change will stress the State's 19    transportation infrastructure, such as bridges and 20    roadways in low-lying areas, and will require more 21    resources to maintain roadways and other transportation 22    infrastructure. 23        (8) State investment in a clean transportation economy 24    in the State can expand equitable access to public health, 25    safety, a cleaner environment, quality jobs, and economic 26    opportunity.   HB2629- 3 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1        (9) It is the public policy of the State to ensure that 2    State residents from communities disproportionately 3    impacted by climate change, communities facing automotive 4    plant closures, economically disadvantaged communities, 5    and individuals experiencing barriers to employment have 6    access to State programs and good jobs and career 7    opportunities in growing sectors of the State economy. 8        (10) To minimize any adverse environmental and health 9    impacts of planned transportation projects and to address 10    inequitable distribution of the burdens of those projects, 11    it is necessary, appropriate, and in the best interests of 12    the State and its citizens to require the Department and 13    MPOs, which are the State's primary transportation 14    planning entities with responsibility for selecting and 15    funding transportation projects, to engage in an enhanced 16    level of planning, modeling, and other analysis, community 17    engagement, and monitoring with respect to those projects 18    as required by this Section. 19        (11) Subsection (a) of Section 15 of the Regional 20    Planning Act provides that the Chicago Metropolitan Agency 21    for Planning, whose Policy Committee is the MPO for 22    Northeastern Illinois, shall be responsible for developing 23    and adopting a funding and implementation strategy for an 24    integrated land use and transportation planning process. 25        (12) Section 48 of the Regional Planning Act provides 26    that the Chicago Metropolitan Agency for Planning shall   HB2629- 4 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1    establish an incentive program to enable local governments 2    and developers to create more affordable workforce housing 3    options near jobs and transit, create jobs near existing 4    affordable workforce housing, create transit-oriented 5    development, integrate transportation and land use 6    planning, provide a range of viable transportation choices 7    in addition to the car, encourage compact and mixed-use 8    development, and support neighborhood revitalization. 9        (13) Paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Section 5303 10    of Title 49 of the United States Code (49 U.S.C. 11    5303(a)(1)) provides, in relevant part, that it is in the 12    national interest to better connect housing and 13    employment, while minimizing transportation-related fuel 14    consumption and air pollution through metropolitan and 15    statewide transportation planning processes. 16        (14) Subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4) of subsection 17    (k) of Section 5303 of Title 49 of the United States Code 18    (49 U.S.C. 5303(k)(4)(A)) provides that MPOs serving 19    transportation management areas may address the 20    integration of housing, transportation, and economic 21    development strategies through a process that provides for 22    effective integration, based on a cooperatively developed 23    and implemented strategy, of new and existing 24    transportation facilities eligible for funding. 25        (15) Subparagraph (C) of paragraph (4) of subsection 26    (k) of Section 5303 of Title 49 of the United States Code   HB2629- 5 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1    (49 U.S.C. 5303(k)(4)(C)) provides that MPOs serving 2    transportation management areas may develop a housing 3    coordination plan that includes projects and strategies 4    that may be considered in the metropolitan transportation 5    plan of the MPO to develop regional goals for the 6    integration of housing, transportation, and economic 7    development strategies. 8        (16) Land use policies and practices that result in 9    shorter distances between where people reside and jobs and 10    other destinations they seek to access and that facilitate 11    multimodal transportation options for the public are one 12    of the most effective tools to reduce greenhouse gas 13    emissions from the transportation sector and provide more 14    affordable transportation options. 15        (17) Transportation is the second-largest expense 16    category for most households and the cost of owning, 17    operating, and maintaining personal vehicles is a 18    significant burden for many households. 19        (18) Reducing vehicle miles traveled per person 20    through more efficient land use and transportation systems 21    will help the State achieve its greenhouse gas reduction 22    goals and reduce the transportation cost burden on State 23    households. 24        (19) To the maximum extent practicable, actions taken 25    to achieve these goals must avoid causing disproportionate 26    adverse impacts to residents of communities that are or   HB2629- 6 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1    have been disproportionately exposed to pollution 2    affecting human health and environmental quality. 3    (b) As used in this Section: 4    "Applicable planning document" means an MPO's Regional 5Transportation Plan or the Department's Long-Range State 6Transportation Plan. "Applicable planning document" includes 7amendments to such plans that add capacity expansion projects 8or other projects resulting in a net increase in GHG 9emissions. 10    "Climate equity accessibility score" means a measurement 11of the impact of certain transportation projects on (i) GHG 12emissions, (ii) the accessibility of jobs and other 13destinations to people residing in the project area, and (iii) 14the affordability of transportation. 15    "CO2e" means the number of metric tons of carbon dioxide 16emissions with the same global warming potential as one metric 17ton of another greenhouse gas, is calculated using Equation 18A-1 in 40 CFR 98.2, and allows for the comparison of emissions 19of various different greenhouse gases with different global 20warming potentials and the calculation of the relative impact 21of the emissions on the environment over a standard time 22period. 23    "Disproportionately impacted community" means the 24residents within a census block group in which, according to 25the most recent federal decennial census, more than 40% of the 26households are low-income households, more than 40% of the   HB2629- 7 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1households identify as minority households, or more than 40% 2of the households are housing cost-burdened, as defined by the 3United States Census Bureau. 4    "Greenhouse gas emissions" or "GHG emissions" means 5emissions of carbon dioxide, methane, nitrous oxide, 6hydrofluorocarbons, perfluorocarbons, nitrogen trifluoride, 7and sulfur hexafluoride. 8    "Greenhouse gas emissions analysis" or "GHG emissions 9analysis" means the analysis of the GHG emissions calculated 10as being generated by the projects and programs contained in 11an applicable planning document. 12    "Greenhouse gas mitigation measure" or "GHG mitigation 13measure" means a project, program, or policy established by 14the Environmental Protection Agency by rule under subparagraph 15(G) of paragraph (3) of subsection (c) that can reasonably be 16expected to result in a quantifiable reduction in GHG 17emissions and that would not be undertaken absent the need by 18the Department or an MPO to reduce GHG emissions to meet their 19greenhouse gas targets. "Greenhouse gas mitigation measure" or 20"GHG mitigation measure" does not include a roadway capacity 21expansion project. "Greenhouse gas mitigation measure" or "GHG 22mitigation measure" includes: 23        (1) the addition of transit and other mobility 24    resources, including, but not limited to, shared bicycle 25    and scooter service, in a manner that will reduce VMT; 26        (2) improving pedestrian and bicycle access,   HB2629- 8 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1    particularly in areas that allow individuals to reduce 2    multiple daily trips and better access transit; 3        (3) transportation demand management to reduce VMT per 4    capita, including, but not limited to, vanpool and shared 5    vehicle programs, remote work and other forms of virtual 6    access, and use of pricing and other incentives for 7    employees and other travelers to use less greenhouse gas 8    intensive travel modes; 9        (4) improving first-and-final mile access to transit 10    stops and stations to make transit safer and more usable; 11        (5) improving the safety, efficiency, and Americans 12    with Disabilities Act compliance of crosswalks and 13    multiuse paths for pedestrians, bicyclists, and other 14    nonmotorized vehicles; 15        (6) changing parking and land use policies and 16    adjusting urban design requirements to encourage more 17    walking, bicycling, and transit trips per capita and 18    reduce VMT per capita; 19        (7) adoption or expansion of school bus, school 20    carpool, or school active transportation programs; 21        (8) electrifying loading docks to allow transportation 22    refrigeration units and auxiliary power units to be 23    plugged into the electric grid at the loading dock instead 24    of running on fossil fuels; 25        (9) accelerating the adoption of ebikes, neighborhood 26    electric carshare vehicles, and other forms of vehicles   HB2629- 9 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1    that emit less greenhouse gas when manufactured and 2    operated; and 3        (10) other measures established or authorized by the 4    Environmental Protection Agency by rule that reduce GHG 5    emissions. 6    "Greenhouse gas target" or "GHG target" means the maximum 7amount of greenhouse gas expressed as CO2e at each of the 8various specified times established by subsection (c) that the 9Department and MPOs must attain through their transportation 10planning and project prioritization and funding processes. 11    "Induced demand" means a concept from economics that as 12supply increases and incurred costs decline, demand will 13increase. This phenomenon has been widely observed and studied 14in transportation systems where highways have been expanded to 15alleviate road congestion problems, resulting in increases in 16vehicle miles traveled. 17    "MPO" means a metropolitan planning organization 18designated by agreement among the units of local government 19and the Governor, charged with developing transportation plans 20and programs in a metropolitan planning area under Section 134 21of Title 23 of the United States Code. 22    "Mitigation action plan" means the plan for implementation 23of GHG mitigation measures prepared by the Department or an 24MPO. 25    "Other entities" means the entities referenced in 26subsection (s).   HB2629- 10 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1    "Roadway capacity expansion project" means a project that 2would be included in the Department's State Transportation 3Improvement Program as an MPO or significant project and that 4(i) adds physical highway traffic capacity or provides for 5grade separation at an intersection or (ii) uses intelligent 6transportation system technology to increase the traffic 7capacity of an existing highway by 10% or more. "Roadway 8capacity expansion project" does not include a project whose 9primary purpose is enhancing public transportation bus 10infrastructure or services. "Roadway capacity expansion 11project" includes all project types, including those described 12as maintenance or rehabilitation projects. 13    "Social cost of carbon" means the estimates of the social 14cost of carbon adopted by the United States Environmental 15Protection Agency, or such higher figure as adopted by the 16Environmental Protection Agency, Department, or MPO under 17subsection (o). 18    "STIP" means a State Transportation Improvement Program. 19    "TIP" means a Transportation Improvement Program. 20    "VMT" means vehicle miles traveled. 21    (c) By January 1, 2027, the Environmental Protection 22Agency, after consultation with the Department and MPOs, must 23establish, by rule, a schedule of GHG targets for GHG 24emissions from the transportation sector in the State that: 25        (1) do not allow GHG emissions in the transportation 26    sector to exceed the greenhouse gas performance targets   HB2629- 11 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1    established by the Environmental Protection Agency for the 2    transportation sector under subsection (p) of Section 9.15 3    of the Environmental Protection Act; 4        (2) specify GHG targets on a 5-year or more frequent 5    compliance year basis; and 6        (3) allocate GHG targets across the transportation 7    sector of the State, which: 8            (A) must provide for an allocation to each MPO for 9        their metropolitan region; 10            (B) must provide for an allocation to the 11        Department for areas outside the boundaries of the 12        State's MPOs; 13            (C) must account for the differences in the 14        feasibility and extent of emissions reductions across 15        forms of land use and across regions of the State; 16            (D) must require that the Department and MPOs 17        factor in the impact of induced demand associated with 18        transportation projects and policies in calculating 19        the GHG emissions generated by their respective 20        transportation systems; 21            (E) must be based on the best available data and 22        modeling tools accessible to the Environmental 23        Protection Agency, such as the SHIFT calculator, after 24        consultation with other State agencies, universities, 25        the federal government, and other appropriate expert 26        sources;   HB2629- 12 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1            (F) must include VMT targets necessary for the 2        Department and MPOs to meet their GHG targets; 3            (G) must set out standards and requirements for 4        acceptable GHG mitigation measures; and 5            (H) may include additional performance targets 6        based on Department district, metropolitan area, 7        geographic region, a per capita calculation, 8        transportation mode, or a combination thereof. 9    (d) When adopting or amending an applicable planning 10document, the Department and an MPO must conduct a GHG 11emissions analysis that: 12        (1) includes (i) the existing transportation network, 13    (ii) the anticipated changes to that network as a result 14    of the projects contained in the applicable planning 15    document, and (iii) the projects in their STIP or TIP; 16        (2) estimates total CO2e emissions in millions of 17    metric tons for each applicable GHG target date 18    established under subsection (c); 19        (3) compares estimated total CO2e emissions against 20    the GHG targets applicable to the Department or MPO; 21        (4) compares the social cost of carbon for total 22    estimated CO2e emissions against the social cost of carbon 23    associated with each applicable GHG target; 24        (5) certifies whether the Department or MPO is in 25    compliance with its applicable GHG targets; and 26        (6) is published in full on the websites of the   HB2629- 13 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1    Department or MPO. 2    (e) The Department, with assistance from the Environmental 3Protection Agency, shall: 4        (1) provide technical assistance to MPOs in fulfilling 5    their responsibilities under this Section, including: 6            (A) assembling and sharing greenhouse gas-related 7        resources and transportation sector best practices in 8        managing GHG emissions; 9            (B) hosting peer reviews and exchanges of 10        technical data, information, assistance, and related 11        activities; 12            (C) making Department staff resources accessible 13        to answer questions and provide in-depth assistance to 14        MPOs on specific issues; 15            (D) providing information about grants and other 16        funding opportunities; 17            (E) conducting evaluations of GHG emissions 18        analyses against national best practices; 19            (F) connecting MPOs to resources in public 20        agencies, universities, and elsewhere; and 21            (H) conducting other similar and related 22        activities to assist MPOs in fulfilling their 23        responsibilities; 24        (2) encourage use of consistent GHG emissions data, 25    assumptions, and methodology by the Department and MPOs; 26        (3) ensure that its planning processes under Sections   HB2629- 14 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1    2705-200, 2705-203, and 2705-205 and its guidance to MPOs 2    under this subsection provide that at least the same level 3    of analytical scrutiny is given to greenhouse gas 4    pollutants as is given to other air pollutants of concern 5    in the State, and include consideration of the impact on 6    GHG emissions of induced demand resulting from roadway 7    capacity expansion projects; 8        (4) update its Metropolitan Planning Organization 9    Cooperative Operations Manual, as necessary; 10        (5) review the GHG emissions analysis used by each MPO 11    to determine if the GHG emissions analysis is inclusive of 12    the complete, actual, and planned transportation network 13    in the applicable planning document and uses reasonable 14    GHG emissions forecasting data, assumptions, modeling, and 15    methodology: 16            (A) if the Department rejects the GHG emissions 17        analysis used by an MPO, the Department shall detail 18        the deficiencies and give the MPO an opportunity to 19        take corrective action; 20            (B) until the MPO takes appropriate corrective 21        action, the Department shall not approve the MPO's 22        applicable planning document, include the projects in 23        the MPO's applicable planning document in the 24        Department's STIP, or make a finding or otherwise 25        represent to the federal government or other 26        governmental agencies that the MPO is in compliance   HB2629- 15 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1        with its legal obligations; 2            (C) if, after given an opportunity for corrective 3        action, an MPO does not submit an acceptable GHG 4        emissions analysis, the Department may substitute its 5        own GHG emissions analysis for planning and 6        programming purposes until the MPO produces an 7        acceptable GHG emissions analysis; and 8            (D) the Department shall establish an appropriate 9        process, including deadlines for timely completion of 10        its review of MPO GHG emissions analyses and for 11        corrective action by MPOs where such is necessary; 12        (6) upon request of an MPO, provide the MPO with a GHG 13    emissions analysis that the MPO can use for purposes of 14    this Section in lieu of the MPO conducting its own GHG 15    emissions analysis; and16        (7) adopt rules applicable to itself, MPOs, and 17    recipients of Department funding so the State can achieve 18    the transportation sector greenhouse gas emissions 19    reduction goals and targets set forth in subsections (c) 20    and (p) of Section 9.15 of the Environmental Protection 21    Act and administer the various processes and requirements 22    set forth in this Section. 23    (f) The Department and each MPO must use a GHG emissions 24analysis to determine if their applicable planning document 25will result in the Department or MPO meeting its GHG targets. 26If a GHG emissions analysis determines that the Department or   HB2629- 16 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1MPO is more likely than not to fail to meet one or more of its 2GHG targets, then the Department or MPO shall identify GHG 3mitigation measures that are needed for the Department or MPO 4to meet its GHG targets as follows:5        (1) The Department or MPO shall submit a mitigation 6    action plan that identifies GHG mitigation measures needed 7    to meet the GHG targets and that includes: 8            (A) the anticipated start and completion date of 9        each GHG mitigation measure; 10            (B) an estimate of the annual CO2e emissions 11        reductions achieved per year by the GHG mitigation 12        measure; 13            (C) an estimate of the impact of the GHG 14        mitigation measure on VMT; 15            (D) quantification of the specific co-benefits 16        from each GHG mitigation measure, including reduction 17        of copollutants, such as PM2.5 and NOx, as well as 18        travel impacts, such as changes to VMT, pedestrian or 19        bike use, and transit ridership; 20            (E) a description of any benefits to 21        disproportionately impacted communities from the GHG 22        mitigation measure, including an estimate of the total 23        amount spent on GHG mitigation measures in or designed 24        to serve disproportionately impacted communities; and 25            (F) a status report submitted annually and 26        published on its website for each GHG mitigation   HB2629- 17 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1        measure that contains the following information 2        concerning each GHG mitigation measure: 3                (i) availability and timing of funding; 4                (ii) implementation timeline; 5                (iii) current status; 6                (iv) for GHG mitigation measures that are in 7            progress or completed, quantification of the 8            greenhouse gas impact of such GHG mitigation 9            measures and any co-benefits or detriments; and 10                (v) for GHG mitigation measures that are 11            delayed, canceled, or substituted, an explanation 12            of why that decision was made and how these GHG 13            mitigation measures or the equivalent will be 14            achieved. 15        (2) GHG mitigation measures are sufficient if the 16    total GHG emissions reduction from the GHG mitigation 17    measures, after accounting for the GHG emissions otherwise 18    resulting from existing and planned projects in the 19    applicable planning document, results in the Department or 20    MPO meeting its GHG targets. Each comparison of GHG 21    emissions reductions and GHG targets under this subsection 22    must be performed over equal comparison periods. 23        (3) In the annual GHG mitigation measures status 24    report under subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1), the 25    Department or MPO shall certify whether its GHG mitigation 26    measures will be sufficient for the Department or MPO to   HB2629- 18 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1    meet its GHG targets. 2    (g) If an applicable planning document does not meet the 3GHG targets for each compliance year even after consideration 4of any GHG mitigation measures, the Department may deem the 5applicable planning document in compliance with this Section 6and approved only if the noncompliant Department or MPO 7allocates funding to advance the achievement of the applicable 8GHG targets as follows: 9        (1) in non-MPO areas, the Department (i) shall not 10    advance a roadway capacity expansion project from its 11    applicable planning document to a STIP or TIP, (ii) shall 12    not otherwise add a roadway capacity expansion project to 13    a STIP or TIP, (iii) shall reprogram funds allocated or 14    anticipated to be expended on roadway capacity expansion 15    projects awaiting inclusion in a STIP or TIP project to 16    GHG mitigation measures that reduce GHG emissions 17    sufficiently to achieve the GHG targets for each 18    compliance year, and (iv) shall amend its applicable 19    planning documents to reflect these changes; 20        (2) in MPO areas that are not in receipt of federal 21    suballocations under the Congestion Mitigation and Air 22    Quality Improvement Program or Surface Transportation 23    Board programs, the Department and MPO (i) shall not 24    advance a roadway capacity expansion project from its 25    applicable planning document to a STIP or TIP, (ii) shall 26    not otherwise add a roadway capacity expansion project to   HB2629- 19 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1    a STIP or TIP, (iii) shall reprogram funds allocated or 2    anticipated to be expended on roadway capacity expansion 3    projects awaiting inclusion in a STIP or TIP project to 4    GHG mitigation measures that reduce GHG emissions 5    sufficiently to achieve the GHG targets for each 6    compliance year, and (iv) shall amend its applicable 7    planning documents to reflect these changes; 8        (3) in MPO areas that are in receipt of federal 9    suballocations under the Congestion Mitigation and Air 10    Quality Improve Program or Surface Transportation Board 11    programs, the Department and MPO (i) shall not advance a 12    roadway capacity expansion project from its applicable 13    planning document to a STIP or TIP, (ii) shall not 14    otherwise add a roadway capacity expansion project to a 15    STIP or TIP, (iii) shall reprogram funds allocated or 16    anticipated to be expended on roadway capacity expansion 17    projects awaiting inclusion in a STIP or TIP project to 18    GHG mitigation measures that reduce GHG emissions 19    sufficiently to achieve the GHG targets for each 20    compliance year, and (iv) shall amend its applicable 21    planning documents to reflect these changes; and 22        (4) the Department and MPOs shall administer 23    paragraphs (1) through (3) as a limitation on their 24    authority to advance roadway capacity expansion projects 25    or other projects that will materially increase GHG 26    emissions under paragraph (5) of subsection (k) of Section   HB2629- 20 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1    5303 of Title 49 of the United States Code (49 U.S.C. 2    5303(k)(5)). 3    (h) Before including a roadway capacity expansion project 4in an applicable planning document, the Department or MPO must 5perform a GHG emissions analysis of the roadway capacity 6expansion project. Following the GHG emissions analysis, the 7Department or MPO must determine if, after consideration of 8all relevant factors, including VMT and social cost of carbon 9increases in the transportation network resulting from induced 10demand, the project conforms with (i) the applicable GHG 11targets and (ii) VMT targets established under subsection (c). 12        (1) If the Department or MPO determines that the 13    roadway capacity expansion project is not in conformance 14    with items (i) and (ii), the Department or MPO must: 15            (A) alter the scope or design of the roadway 16        capacity expansion project and perform a GHG emissions 17        analysis that shows that the roadway capacity 18        expansion project meets the requirements of items (i) 19        and (ii); 20            (B) incorporate sufficient GHG mitigation measures 21        to bring the Department or MPO into compliance with 22        its GHG targets, however, in order to be effective, 23        such GHG mitigation measures must be implemented no 24        later than contemporaneously with the implementation 25        of the roadway expansion project or, if not 26        implemented contemporaneously, a GHG mitigation   HB2629- 21 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1        measure must provide a valid GHG emissions reduction 2        after the date it is implemented; or 3            (C) halt development of the roadway capacity 4        expansion project and remove the roadway capacity 5        expansion project from all applicable planning 6        documents. 7        (2) The Department and MPOs must establish a process 8    for performing roadway capacity expansion project GHG 9    emissions analysis. A GHG emissions analysis for a roadway 10    capacity expansion project must include, but shall not be 11    limited to, estimates resulting from the project for the 12    following: 13            (A) GHG emissions over a period of 20 years or the 14        last GHG target year, whichever is later; 15            (B) a net change in VMT and social cost of carbon 16        for the transportation network after factoring in the 17        effects of induced demand; and 18            (C) consideration of additional VMT in the 19        transportation network from additional capacity 20        resulting from roadway traffic capacity expansion, 21        intelligent transportation systems, or both. 22        (3) The Department or MPO must connect any GHG 23    mitigation measures associated with the roadway capacity 24    expansion project as follows: 25            (A) within or associated with at least one of the 26        communities impacted by the roadway capacity expansion   HB2629- 22 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1        project; 2            (B) if there is not a reasonably feasible location 3        under subparagraph (A), in areas of persistent poverty 4        or historically disadvantaged communities, as measured 5        and defined by federal law, guidance and notices of 6        funding opportunity; 7            (C) if there is not a reasonably feasible location 8        under subparagraphs (A) and (B), in the region of the 9        roadway capacity expansion project; and 10            (D) if there is not a reasonably feasible location 11        under subparagraphs (A) through (C), on a statewide 12        basis. 13        (4) The Department or MPO must develop and use a 14    process for community consultation consistent with the 15    requirements of subsection (m) in the development of GHG 16    mitigation measures that the Department or MPO uses to 17    achieve compliance with its GHG targets. 18        (5) The Department or MPO must publish an explanation 19    regarding the feasibility and rationale for each GHG 20    mitigation measure under subparagraphs (B) through (D) of 21    paragraph (3). 22        (6) GHG mitigation measures connected to a roadway 23    expansion project are sufficient if the total greenhouse 24    gas reduction from the GHG mitigation measures is at least 25    equal to the total GHG emissions resulting from the 26    roadway capacity expansion project and consistent with the   HB2629- 23 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1    Department or MPO meeting its GHG targets. 2            (A) Each comparison under this paragraph must be 3        performed over equal comparison periods. 4            (B) To avoid double counting, once a GHG 5        mitigation measure is connected to a roadway capacity 6        expansion project, that GHG mitigation measure shall 7        not be used to offset greenhouse gases associated with 8        other roadway capacity expansion projects or other 9        projects included in an applicable planning document. 10        (7) The Department and MPOs must publish information 11    regarding roadway capacity expansion project GHG emissions 12    analyses on their websites. The information must include: 13            (A) an identification of each roadway capacity 14        expansion project; and 15            (B) for each roadway capacity expansion project, a 16        summary that includes an overview of and link to the 17        roadway capacity expansion project GHG emissions 18        analysis, the greenhouse gas impact determination by 19        the Department or MPO, the social cost of carbon added 20        by the roadway capacity expansion project, and project 21        disposition, including a review of any GHG mitigation 22        measures. 23    (i) The Department and MPOs may use a GHG mitigation 24measure as an offset against GHG emissions only after the date 25the GHG mitigation measure has been implemented. 26    (j) By January 1, 2029, and every 3 years thereafter, the   HB2629- 24 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1Department shall prepare a comprehensive, publicly released 2report on statewide transportation greenhouse gas reduction 3accomplishments and challenges and make recommendations for 4any legislative action or State agency rulemaking that would 5assist the Department and MPOs in meeting their GHG targets. 6The report, at a minimum, shall include: 7        (1) a description of whether the Department and MPOs 8    are on track to meet their GHG targets and VMT targets; 9        (2) an assessment of State and local laws, 10    regulations, rules, and practices and recommendations for 11    modifications that would help ensure that the Department 12    and MPOs meet their GHG targets and VMT targets; 13        (3) a description of the benefits from reductions in 14    GHG emissions and copollutants in the transportation 15    sector, diversification of energy sources used for 16    transportation, and substitution of other motorized and 17    nonmotorized modes of travel for VMT currently being 18    handled by vehicles powered by internal combustion 19    engines, and other economic, environmental, and public 20    health benefits; 21        (4) a description of the compliance costs borne by the 22    Department and MPOs in meeting their GHG targets and VMT 23    targets; 24        (5) a description of the social cost of carbon 25    associated with the transportation systems for which the 26    Department and each MPO is responsible and the social cost   HB2629- 25 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1    of carbon reductions that result from GHG mitigation 2    measures and other steps being taken by the Department and 3    each MPO to reduce GHG emissions; 4        (6) a description of whether measures taken by the 5    Department and MPOs to meet GHG targets are equitable, 6    minimize costs, and maximize the total benefits to the 7    State and its citizens; and 8        (7) a description of whether activities undertaken to 9    meet GHG targets by the Department and MPOs have unduly 10    burdened disproportionately impacted communities. 11    (k) Before including any project that has an anticipated 12cost of $30,000,000 or more (i) in an applicable planning 13document or (ii) as a GHG mitigation measure, the Department 14or MPO shall calculate a climate equity accessibility score 15for the project. The climate equity accessibility score shall 16be based on a GHG emissions analysis of the project and a 17measurement of (i) the current levels of access to jobs, 18hospitals, schools, and food by available modes of 19transportation and (ii) the current level of affordability of 20transportation in the project area. The Department and MPO 21shall then calculate a climate equity accessibility score 22based on the projected change in GHG emissions, accessibility, 23and affordability from the proposed project. Projects that 24result in relatively high reductions of GHG emissions while 25increasing access to jobs and other destinations and providing 26more affordable transportation options will receive a higher   HB2629- 26 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1climate equity accessibility score than projects that fail to 2deliver such benefits. To advance the goals of this Section 3and optimize the use of public funds, the Department and MPOs 4shall give priority to projects with high climate equity 5accessibility scores, considering which project delivers the 6most climate equity accessibility score benefit per dollar 7invested. The Department, with the assistance of the 8Environmental Protection Agency, shall provide technical 9assistance to MPOs in fulfilling their responsibilities under 10this subsection. 11    (l) To the full extent allowed by paragraph (4) of 12subsection (k) of Section 5303 of Title 49 of the United States 13Code and other applicable laws, and to extend the existing 14authority under State law vested in the Chicago Metropolitan 15Agency for Planning to MPOs throughout the State, MPOs, with 16the full support of the Department, shall conduct housing 17coordination planning to help the Department and MPOs meet 18their GHG targets. 19        (1) MPOs shall develop housing coordination plans 20    consistent with subparagraph (C) of paragraph (4) of 21    subsection (k) of Section 5303 of Title 49 of the United 22    States Code (49 U.S.C. 5303(k)(4)(C)) to better integrate 23    housing, transportation, and economic development 24    strategies and to, among other things: 25            (A) better connect housing and employment while 26        mitigating commuting times;   HB2629- 27 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1            (B) align transportation improvements with housing 2        needs, such as housing supply shortages, and proposed 3        housing development; 4            (C) align planning for housing and transportation 5        to address needs in relationship to household incomes 6        within the metropolitan planning area; 7            (D) expand housing and economic development within 8        the catchment areas of existing transportation 9        facilities and public transportation services when 10        appropriate, including higher-density development, as 11        locally determined; 12            (E) manage effects of VMT growth in the 13        metropolitan planning area related to housing 14        development and economic development; and 15            (F) increase the share of households with 16        sufficient and affordable access to the transportation 17        networks of the metropolitan planning area. 18        (2) MPOs shall identify the location of existing and 19    planned housing and employment and transportation options 20    that connect housing and employment. 21        (3) MPOs shall include a comparison of State, 22    regional, and local transportation plans in the region to 23    land use management plans, including zoning plans, that 24    may affect road use, public transportation ridership, and 25    housing development. 26        (4) In their housing coordination planning, MPOs shall   HB2629- 28 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1    focus on the effect that land use policies and practices, 2    such as minimum parking requirements and exclusionary 3    zoning requirements, contribute to increases in VMT and 4    GHG emissions and consider how such policies affect 5    housing and transportation affordability. 6        (5) MPOs shall outline recommendations for land use 7    policies and best practices that have the effect of 8    increasing the affordability of housing and transportation 9    and reducing GHG emissions. 10        (6) The Department shall assist MPOs in their housing 11    coordination planning and make best efforts to align the 12    Department's planning and project programming with MPO 13    efforts to encourage land use policies and best practices 14    that have the effect of increasing the affordability of 15    housing and transportation, improving accessibility to 16    destinations, and reducing GHG emissions. 17        (7) The Department shall not advance to the STIP a 18    project in a metropolitan planning area that the MPO has 19    determined would conflict with its housing coordination 20    plan prepared under paragraph (1) or would have the effect 21    of decreasing the affordability of transportation or the 22    accessibility of destinations or of increasing GHG 23    emissions. 24        (8) In furtherance of Section 48 of the Regional 25    Planning Act, the Department and MPOs shall adopt 26    performance-based methods for allocating discretionary   HB2629- 29 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1    funds that reward jurisdictions that have adopted land use 2    policies and practices associated with increasing the 3    affordability of housing and transportation, improving 4    accessibility to destinations, and reducing GHG emissions. 5            (A) The Department and MPOs may build on the 6        climate equity accessibility scoring tool developed 7        under subsection (k) or develop a separate tool for 8        identifying jurisdictions that have adopted land use 9        policies and practices associated with increasing the 10        affordability of housing and transportation, improving 11        accessibility to destinations, and reducing GHG 12        emissions. 13            (B) The Department and MPOs shall publicly 14        describe the methodology they use in allocating 15        discretionary funding under this paragraph. 16            (C) When allocating discretionary funding, the 17        Department and MPOs shall give at least equal weight 18        to land use policies and practices that facilitate 19        reductions in GHG emissions that they give to existing 20        factors, such as congestion relief, safety, and 21        traffic operations. 22            (D) The Department and MPOs shall consider land 23        use policies and practices as provided in this 24        subsection when allocating discretionary funding from 25        every source. 26        (9) When evaluating all projects for possible   HB2629- 30 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1    inclusion in applicable planning documents or in a STIP or 2    TIP, the Department and MPOs shall adopt performance-based 3    project selection methods that give priority to projects 4    located in jurisdictions that have adopted land use 5    policies and practices associated with increasing the 6    affordability of housing and transportation, improving 7    accessibility to destinations, and reducing GHG emissions. 8        (10) This subsection shall not diminish or restrict 9    the existing authority of jurisdictions over their land 10    use policies and practices. 11    (m) The Department and MPOs shall provide early and 12continuous opportunities for public participation in the 13transportation planning process. The process shall be 14proactive and provide timely information, adequate public 15notice, reasonable public access, and opportunities for public 16review and comment at key decision points in the process. The 17objectives of public participation in the transportation 18planning process include providing a mechanism for public 19perspectives, needs, and ideas to be considered in the 20planning process; developing the public's understanding of the 21problems and opportunities facing the transportation system; 22demonstrating explicit consideration and response to public 23input through a variety of tools and techniques; and 24developing a consensus on plans. The Department shall develop 25a documented public participation process under 23 CFR 450. 26        (1) Under 23 CFR 450, Subpart B, the Department is   HB2629- 31 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1    responsible, in cooperation with the MPOs, for carrying 2    out public participation for developing, amending, and 3    updating the Long-Range State Transportation Plan, the 4    STIP, and other statewide transportation planning 5    activities. 6        (2) Under 23 CFR 450, Subpart C, the MPOs, in 7    cooperation with the Department, are responsible for 8    carrying out public participation for the development of 9    Regional Transportation Plans, TIPs, and other regional 10    transportation planning activities for their respective 11    metropolitan planning areas. 12        (3) Public participation activities at both the MPO 13    and Department levels shall include, at a minimum: 14            (A) establishing and maintaining for the 15        geographic area of responsibility a list of all known 16        parties interested in transportation planning, 17        including, but not limited to: elected officials; 18        municipal and county planning staffs; affected public 19        agencies; local, State, and federal agencies eligible 20        for federal and State transportation funds; local 21        representatives of public transportation agency 22        employees and users; freight shippers and providers of 23        freight transportation services; public and private 24        transportation providers; representatives of users of 25        transit, bicycling, pedestrian, aviation, and train 26        facilities; private industry; environmental and other   HB2629- 32 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1        interest groups; representatives of persons or groups 2        that may be underserved by existing transportation 3        systems, such as minority persons, low-income seniors, 4        persons with disabilities, and persons with limited 5        English proficiency; and members of the general public 6        expressing interest in the transportation planning 7        process; 8            (B) providing reasonable notice, which for notice 9        to a disproportionately impacted community requires 10        the notice to be translated into the primary language 11        spoken in the disproportionately impacted community, 12        and opportunity to comment through mailing lists and 13        other communication methods on upcoming transportation 14        planning-related activities and meetings; 15            (C) using reasonably available Internet or 16        traditional media opportunities, including minority 17        media and diverse media, to provide timely notices of 18        planning-related activities and meetings to members of 19        the public, including limited English proficiency 20        individuals and others who may require reasonable 21        accommodations. Methods that shall be used to the 22        maximum extent practicable for public participation 23        may include, but shall not be limited to, use of the 24        Internet, social media, news media, such as 25        newspapers, radio, or television, mailings to 26        disproportionately impacted communities by existing   HB2629- 33 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1        transportation systems, including, but not limited to, 2        seniors and persons with disabilities, and notices, 3        including electronic mail and online newsletters; 4            (D) seeking out persons and groups, including 5        minority groups and those with disabilities, 6        low-income, and limited English proficiency, for the 7        purposes of exchanging information, increasing their 8        involvement, and considering their transportation 9        needs in the transportation planning process; 10            (E) consulting, as appropriate, with federal, 11        State, local, and tribal agencies responsible for land 12        use management, natural resources, environmental 13        protection, conservation, cultural resources, and 14        historic preservation concerning the development of 15        long-range transportation plans; 16            (F) providing reasonable public access to, and 17        appropriate opportunities for public review and 18        comment on, criteria, standards, and other 19        planning-related information. Reasonable public access 20        includes, but is not limited to, limited English 21        proficiency services and access to ADA-compliant 22        facilities, as well as to the Internet; 23            (G) where feasible, scheduling the development of 24        regional and statewide plans so that the release of 25        the draft plans may be coordinated to provide for the 26        opportunity for joint public outreach;   HB2629- 34 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1            (H) responses, in writing, from the Department and 2        MPOs to all significant issues raised during the 3        review and comment period on transportation plans, 4        making the responses available to the public; and 5            (I) collaborating periodically with all interested 6        parties and the Department and MPOs to review the 7        effectiveness of the Department's and MPOs' public 8        involvement practices to ensure that they provide full 9        and open access to all members of the public. When 10        necessary, the Department or MPO shall revise their 11        public participation practices in the transportation 12        planning process and allow time for public review and 13        comment per 23 CFR 450. 14    (n) Beginning on January 1, 2026, each applicable planning 15document from the Department or MPO must include a 16consolidated and comprehensive list of all project types to be 17funded using any federal, State, or local funding source, 18including bicycle, pedestrian, bus, rail, and roadway 19projects, and shall include a summary of planned expenditures 20by project type. 21    (o) Beginning September 30, 2026, the Department and MPOs 22shall establish a social cost of carbon and use the social cost 23of carbon in their applicable planning documents and other 24planning activities. 25        (1) The social cost of carbon shall serve as a 26    monetary estimate of the value of not emitting a ton of GHG   HB2629- 35 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1    emissions. 2        (2) In developing the social cost of carbon applicable 3    to the projects and programs in their applicable planning 4    documents and for other planning and project programming 5    activities, the Department and MPOs shall consider the 6    social cost of carbon established by the Environmental 7    Protection Agency under subsection (q) of Section 9.15 of 8    the Environmental Protection Act and may consider prior or 9    existing estimates of the social cost of carbon issued or 10    adopted by the federal government, appropriate 11    international bodies, or other appropriate and reputable 12    scientific organizations. 13        (3) The Department may adopt the social cost of carbon 14    established by the Environmental Protection Agency under 15    subsection (q) of Section 9.15 of the Environmental 16    Protection Act or establish its own social cost of carbon 17    through the process set forth in paragraphs (1) and (2), 18    but the Department shall not adopt a social cost of carbon 19    that is lower than that established by the Environmental 20    Protection Agency. 21        (4) MPOs may adopt the social cost of carbon 22    established by the Environmental Protection Agency under 23    subsection (q) of Section 9.15 of the Environmental 24    Protection Act or by the Department under paragraph (3) or 25    establish their own social cost of carbon through the 26    process set forth in paragraphs (1) and (2), but an MPO   HB2629- 36 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1    shall not adopt a social cost of carbon that is lower than 2    that established by the Environmental Protection Agency or 3    the Department. 4        (5) The Department shall incorporate the social cost 5    of carbon into its assessment of projects for possible 6    inclusion in its applicable planning document or for 7    inclusion in a STIP or TIP, giving priority to projects 8    that have a relatively low social cost of carbon:9            (A) The Department shall not include any project 10        over $30,000,000 in an applicable planning document or 11        a STIP or TIP unless it has calculated the social cost 12        of carbon resulting from the project over the useful 13        life of the project.14            (B) Such calculations shall result in an estimate 15        of the social cost of carbon under a no-build scenario 16        and an estimate of the social cost of carbon if the 17        project is built, factoring in the effects of induced 18        demand and other appropriate factors.19            (C) The estimate of the social cost of carbon must 20        include total additional GHG emissions attributable to 21        the proposed project and shall not be limited to GHG 22        emissions from within the physical boundaries of the 23        project.24            (D) The Department shall publish in applicable 25        planning documents and STIPs the no-build and build 26        estimates of the social cost of carbon for each   HB2629- 37 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1        project for which an estimate of the social cost of 2        carbon has been prepared.3            (E) For purposes of its planning processes under 4        Sections 2705-200, 2705-203, and 2705-205, and after 5        factoring in the effects of induced demand on VMT 6        attributable to a proposed project, the Department 7        shall offset the social cost of carbon and the social 8        cost of crashes attributable to a project against its 9        projections of the value of the time savings from any 10        reduction in congestion attributable to the project 11        and shall publish its calculations and results. 12            (F) The Department may rely upon estimates of the 13        social cost of carbon prepared by MPOs for projects 14        included in a STIP that are located inside the MPO's 15        boundaries only if the Department finds that those 16        estimates of the social cost of carbon are based on 17        reasonable assumptions and methodology. 18        (6) Each MPO shall incorporate the social cost of 19    carbon into its assessment of projects for possible 20    inclusion in its applicable planning document or for 21    inclusion in a TIP, giving priority to projects that have 22    a relatively low social cost of carbon:23            (A) An MPO shall not include any project over 24        $30,000,000 in a TIP unless it has calculated the 25        social cost of carbon resulting from the project over 26        the useful life of the project.  HB2629- 38 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1            (B) Such calculations shall result in an estimate 2        of the social cost of carbon under a no-build scenario 3        and an estimate of the social cost of carbon if the 4        project is built, factoring in the effects of induced 5        demand and other appropriate factors.6            (C) The estimate of the social cost of carbon must 7        include total additional GHG emissions attributable to 8        the proposed project and shall not be limited to GHG 9        emissions from within the physical boundaries of the 10        project.11            (D) Each MPO shall publish in its applicable 12        planning documents and TIPs the no-build and build 13        estimates of the social cost of carbon for each 14        project for which an estimate of the social cost of 15        carbon has been prepared.16            (E) For purposes of its planning processes, and 17        after factoring in the effects of induced demand on 18        VMT attributable to a proposed project, an MPO shall 19        offset the social cost of carbon and the social cost of 20        crashes attributable to a project from its projection 21        of the value of the time savings from any reduction in 22        congestion attributable to the project and shall 23        publish its calculations and results. 24            (F) An MPO may rely upon the estimate of the social 25        cost of carbon prepared by the Department for projects 26        included in a TIP only if the MPO finds that the   HB2629- 39 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1        Department's estimates of the social cost of carbon 2        are based on reasonable assumptions and methodologies. 3    (p) By no later than January 1, 2026, the Department shall 4convene a Greenhouse Gas in Transportation Working Group. 5        (1) The Working Group shall assist the Department and 6    MPOs with: 7            (A) planning and implementing the requirements of 8        this Section; 9            (B) identifying opportunities to reduce GHG 10        emissions in the transportation sector; 11            (C) identifying promising GHG mitigation measures; 12            (D) preparing the Department's triennial report on 13        statewide transportation sector greenhouse gas 14        reduction accomplishments and challenges and make 15        recommendations for any legislative or regulatory 16        action that would assist the Department and MPOs in 17        meeting their GHG targets; and 18            (E) connecting the Department and MPOs with local, 19        regional, and national experts and best practices 20        relating to planning and programming transportation 21        projects to, among other things, reduce GHG emissions 22        from the transportation sector. 23        (2) The membership of the Working Group shall include 24    the following: 25            (A) the Secretary of Transportation or the 26        Secretary's designee;   HB2629- 40 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1            (B) the Director of the Environmental Protection 2        Agency or the Director's designee; 3            (C) the Chair of the Chicago Metropolitan Agency 4        for Planning or the Chair's designee; 5            (D) the chair of another MPO or the chair's 6        designee, appointed by the Governor; 7            (E) a university representative with expertise in 8        GHG emissions in the transportation sector, appointed 9        by the Governor; 10            (F) a representative from an environmental justice 11        organization, appointed by the Governor; 12            (G) a representative from an active transportation 13        organization, appointed by the Governor; 14            (H) a representative from a transportation 15        planning organization, appointed by the Governor; 16            (I) a representative from a land use planning 17        organization, appointed by the Governor; 18            (J) a representative from the freight industry, 19        appointed by the Governor; 20            (K) a representative from a public transportation 21        agency, appointed by the Governor; 22            (L) a representative from a labor organization, 23        appointed by the Governor; 24            (M) a representative from a road building 25        contractor, appointed by the Governor; 26            (N) a representative from a chamber of commerce,   HB2629- 41 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1        appointed by the Governor; 2            (P) a representative from the engineering sector, 3        appointed by the Governor; and 4            (Q) such other representatives, appointed by the 5        Governor, that will ensure that the Working Group will 6        provide the Department and MPOs with a sufficient 7        range and depth of expertise in GHG emissions 8        reduction in the transportation sector to assist the 9        Department and MPOs in carrying out their 10        responsibilities under this Section. 11        (3) The members of the Working Group must select a 12    Chair from its membership. 13        (4) Members of the Working Group shall serve without 14    compensation other than reimbursement for travel and other 15    expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. 16        (5) The Department shall provide sufficient staff 17    support and other resources for the Working Group to 18    perform its duties effectively, including a website 19    accessible to the public that contains an up-to-date 20    record of the activities, research, reports, 21    recommendations, and other materials assembled by the 22    Working Group. 23        (6) The Working Group shall first meet within 90 days 24    of the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th 25    General Assembly. The Working Group shall hold public 26    meetings no less than quarterly, shall actively seek   HB2629- 42 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1    public input, shall publish annual reports, and by June 2    30, 2028, shall publish a report with recommendations for 3    how the Department and MPOs can most effectively reduce 4    GHG emissions from the transportation sector. 5        (7) The Department shall consider and incorporate 6    recommendations from the Working Group in its triennial 7    reports under subsection (j), and both the Department and 8    MPOs shall consider and incorporate such recommendations 9    in their preparation of their applicable planning 10    documents. 11        (8) The Working Group shall operate through January 12    30, 2029, or 30 days after the Department's filing of its 13    first triennial report, whichever is later. The Working 14    Group shall continue in operation after that date to 15    further assist the Department and MPOs in fulfilling their 16    responsibilities under this Section unless abolished by 17    the Governor after receipt of abolition recommendations 18    from both the Environmental Protection Agency and the 19    Department. 20    (q) Except as otherwise provided, the requirements of this 21Section shall commence with projects included in applicable 22planning documents filed on or after January 1, 2028. 23    (r) The requirements of this Section are in addition to 24and shall, to the extent practicable, be executed concurrently 25with other requirements for transportation planning, project 26prioritization, public outreach, project implementation, or   HB2629- 43 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1transparency and accountability established by law, rule, or 2policy. 3    (s) The requirements of this Section shall extend to the 4Illinois State Toll Highway Authority and any other builder or 5operator of a public highway under a public-private 6partnership agreement or other means authorized by State law.7        (1) The requirements of this Section that apply to the 8    other entities include, but are not limited to, the 9    following:10            (A) the Environmental Protection Agency shall 11        assign GHG targets to other entities under subsection 12        (c);13            (B) other entities shall conduct GHG emissions 14        analysis and be subject to the other requirements set 15        forth in subsections (d), (e), (f), (g), and (h) with 16        respect to their applicable planning documents;17            (C) other entities shall conduct climate equity 18        accessibility scoring as set forth in subsection (k);19            (D) other entities shall follow the public 20        participation requirements set forth in subsection 21        (j); and22            (E) other entities shall use the social cost of 23        carbon in their planning and project programming 24        processes as set forth in subsection (o).25        (2) Other entities may request assistance in complying 26    with the requirements of this Section from the Department   HB2629- 44 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1    under subsection (e) and from the Greenhouse Gas in 2    Transportation Working Group under subsection (p).3        (3) With respect to other entities, "applicable 4    planning document" means the other entity's capital plan 5    or other document in which the other entity identifies 6    projects that it anticipates advancing for construction.7        (4) The Department may adopt rules necessary to extend 8    the requirements of this Section to the other entities.  9    Section 10. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 10changing Section 9.15 as follows: 11    (415 ILCS 5/9.15)12    Sec. 9.15. Greenhouse gases.13     (a) An air pollution construction permit shall not be 14required due to emissions of greenhouse gases if the 15equipment, site, or source is not subject to regulation, as 16defined by 40 CFR 52.21, as now or hereafter amended, for 17greenhouse gases or is otherwise not addressed in this Section 18or by the Board in regulations for greenhouse gases. These 19exemptions do not relieve an owner or operator from the 20obligation to comply with other applicable rules or 21regulations.22     (b) An air pollution operating permit shall not be 23required due to emissions of greenhouse gases if the 24equipment, site, or source is not subject to regulation, as   HB2629- 45 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1defined by Section 39.5 of this Act, for greenhouse gases or is 2otherwise not addressed in this Section or by the Board in 3regulations for greenhouse gases. These exemptions do not 4relieve an owner or operator from the obligation to comply 5with other applicable rules or regulations.6    (c) (Blank). 7    (d) (Blank).8    (e) (Blank). 9    (f) As used in this Section:10    "Carbon dioxide emission" means the plant annual CO2 total 11output emission as measured by the United States Environmental 12Protection Agency in its Emissions & Generation Resource 13Integrated Database (eGrid), or its successor. 14    "Carbon dioxide equivalent emissions" or "CO2e" means the 15sum total of the mass amount of emissions in tons per year, 16calculated by multiplying the mass amount of each of the 6 17greenhouse gases specified in Section 3.207, in tons per year, 18by its associated global warming potential as set forth in 40 19CFR 98, subpart A, table A-1 or its successor, and then adding 20them all together.21    "Cogeneration" or "combined heat and power" refers to any 22system that, either simultaneously or sequentially, produces 23electricity and useful thermal energy from a single fuel 24source.25    "Copollutants" refers to the 6 criteria pollutants that 26have been identified by the United States Environmental   HB2629- 46 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1Protection Agency pursuant to the Clean Air Act.2    "Electric generating unit" or "EGU" means a fossil 3fuel-fired stationary boiler, combustion turbine, or combined 4cycle system that serves a generator that has a nameplate 5capacity greater than 25 MWe and produces electricity for 6sale.7    "Environmental justice community" means the definition of 8that term based on existing methodologies and findings, used 9and as may be updated by the Illinois Power Agency and its 10program administrator in the Illinois Solar for All Program.11    "Equity investment eligible community" or "eligible 12community" means the geographic areas throughout Illinois that 13would most benefit from equitable investments by the State 14designed to combat discrimination and foster sustainable 15economic growth. Specifically, eligible community means the 16following areas:17        (1) areas where residents have been historically 18    excluded from economic opportunities, including 19    opportunities in the energy sector, as defined as R3 areas 20    pursuant to Section 10-40 of the Cannabis Regulation and 21    Tax Act; and22        (2) areas where residents have been historically 23    subject to disproportionate burdens of pollution, 24    including pollution from the energy sector, as established 25    by environmental justice communities as defined by the 26    Illinois Power Agency pursuant to the Illinois Power   HB2629- 47 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1    Agency Act, excluding any racial or ethnic indicators.2    "Equity investment eligible person" or "eligible person" 3means the persons who would most benefit from equitable 4investments by the State designed to combat discrimination and 5foster sustainable economic growth. Specifically, eligible 6person means the following people:7        (1) persons whose primary residence is in an equity 8    investment eligible community;9        (2) persons whose primary residence is in a 10    municipality, or a county with a population under 100,000, 11    where the closure of an electric generating unit or mine 12    has been publicly announced or the electric generating 13    unit or mine is in the process of closing or closed within 14    the last 5 years;15        (3) persons who are graduates of or currently enrolled 16    in the foster care system; or17        (4) persons who were formerly incarcerated.18    "Existing emissions" means: 19        (1) for CO2e, the total average tons-per-year of CO2e 20    emitted by the EGU or large GHG-emitting unit either in 21    the years 2018 through 2020 or, if the unit was not yet in 22    operation by January 1, 2018, in the first 3 full years of 23    that unit's operation; and24        (2) for any copollutant, the total average 25    tons-per-year of that copollutant emitted by the EGU or 26    large GHG-emitting unit either in the years 2018 through   HB2629- 48 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1    2020 or, if the unit was not yet in operation by January 1, 2    2018, in the first 3 full years of that unit's operation. 3    "Green hydrogen" means a power plant technology in which 4an EGU creates electric power exclusively from electrolytic 5hydrogen, in a manner that produces zero carbon and 6copollutant emissions, using hydrogen fuel that is 7electrolyzed using a 100% renewable zero carbon emission 8energy source.9    "Large greenhouse gas-emitting unit" or "large 10GHG-emitting unit" means a unit that is an electric generating 11unit or other fossil fuel-fired unit that itself has a 12nameplate capacity or serves a generator that has a nameplate 13capacity greater than 25 MWe and that produces electricity, 14including, but not limited to, coal-fired, coal-derived, 15oil-fired, natural gas-fired, and cogeneration units.16    "NOx emission rate" means the plant annual NOx total output 17emission rate as measured by the United States Environmental 18Protection Agency in its Emissions & Generation Resource 19Integrated Database (eGrid), or its successor, in the most 20recent year for which data is available.21    "Public greenhouse gas-emitting units" or "public 22GHG-emitting unit" means large greenhouse gas-emitting units, 23including EGUs, that are wholly owned, directly or indirectly, 24by one or more municipalities, municipal corporations, joint 25municipal electric power agencies, electric cooperatives, or 26other governmental or nonprofit entities, whether organized   HB2629- 49 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1and created under the laws of Illinois or another state.2    "SO2 emission rate" means the "plant annual SO2 total 3output emission rate" as measured by the United States 4Environmental Protection Agency in its Emissions & Generation 5Resource Integrated Database (eGrid), or its successor, in the 6most recent year for which data is available.7    (g) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 8use coal or oil as a fuel and are not public GHG-emitting units 9shall permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant emissions to 10zero no later than January 1, 2030.11    (h) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 12use coal as a fuel and are public GHG-emitting units shall 13permanently reduce CO2e emissions to zero no later than 14December 31, 2045. Any source or plant with such units must 15also reduce their CO2e emissions by 45% from existing 16emissions by no later than January 1, 2035. If the emissions 17reduction requirement is not achieved by December 31, 2035, 18the plant shall retire one or more units or otherwise reduce 19its CO2e emissions by 45% from existing emissions by June 30, 202038.21    (i) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 22use gas as a fuel and are not public GHG-emitting units shall 23permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant emissions to zero, 24including through unit retirement or the use of 100% green 25hydrogen or other similar technology that is commercially 26proven to achieve zero carbon emissions, according to the   HB2629- 50 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1following:2        (1) No later than January 1, 2030: all EGUs and large 3    greenhouse gas-emitting units that have a NOx emissions 4    rate of greater than 0.12 lbs/MWh or a SO2 emission rate of 5    greater than 0.006 lb/MWh, and are located in or within 3 6    miles of an environmental justice community designated as 7    of January 1, 2021 or an equity investment eligible 8    community.9        (2) No later than January 1, 2040: all EGUs and large 10    greenhouse gas-emitting units that have a NOx emission 11    rate of greater than 0.12 lbs/MWh or a SO2 emission rate 12    greater than 0.006 lb/MWh, and are not located in or 13    within 3 miles of an environmental justice community 14    designated as of January 1, 2021 or an equity investment 15    eligible community. After January 1, 2035, each such EGU 16    and large greenhouse gas-emitting unit shall reduce its 17    CO2e emissions by at least 50% from its existing emissions 18    for CO2e, and shall be limited in operation to, on average, 19    6 hours or less per day, measured over a calendar year, and 20    shall not run for more than 24 consecutive hours except in 21    emergency conditions, as designated by a Regional 22    Transmission Organization or Independent System Operator.23        (3) No later than January 1, 2035: all EGUs and large 24    greenhouse gas-emitting units that began operation prior 25    to the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 102nd 26    General Assembly and have a NOx emission rate of less than   HB2629- 51 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1    or equal to 0.12 lb/MWh and a SO2 emission rate less than 2    or equal to 0.006 lb/MWh, and are located in or within 3 3    miles of an environmental justice community designated as 4    of January 1, 2021 or an equity investment eligible 5    community. Each such EGU and large greenhouse gas-emitting 6    unit shall reduce its CO2e emissions by at least 50% from 7    its existing emissions for CO2e no later than January 1, 8    2030.9        (4) No later than January 1, 2040: All remaining EGUs 10    and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that have a heat 11    rate greater than or equal to 7000 BTU/kWh. Each such EGU 12    and Large greenhouse gas-emitting unit shall reduce its 13    CO2e emissions by at least 50% from its existing emissions 14    for CO2e no later than January 1, 2035.15        (5) No later than January 1, 2045: all remaining EGUs 16    and large greenhouse gas-emitting units. 17    (j) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 18use gas as a fuel and are public GHG-emitting units shall 19permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant emissions to zero, 20including through unit retirement or the use of 100% green 21hydrogen or other similar technology that is commercially 22proven to achieve zero carbon emissions by January 1, 2045.23    (k) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 24utilize combined heat and power or cogeneration technology 25shall permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant emissions to 26zero, including through unit retirement or the use of 100%   HB2629- 52 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1green hydrogen or other similar technology that is 2commercially proven to achieve zero carbon emissions by 3January 1, 2045.4    (k-5) No EGU or large greenhouse gas-emitting unit that 5uses gas as a fuel and is not a public GHG-emitting unit may 6emit, in any 12-month period, CO2e or copollutants in excess of 7that unit's existing emissions for those pollutants. 8    (l) Notwithstanding subsections (g) through (k-5), large 9GHG-emitting units including EGUs may temporarily continue 10emitting CO2e and copollutants after any applicable deadline 11specified in any of subsections (g) through (k-5) if it has 12been determined, as described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of 13this subsection, that ongoing operation of the EGU is 14necessary to maintain power grid supply and reliability or 15ongoing operation of large GHG-emitting unit that is not an 16EGU is necessary to serve as an emergency backup to 17operations. Up to and including the occurrence of an emission 18reduction deadline under subsection (i), all EGUs and large 19GHG-emitting units must comply with the following terms:20        (1) if an EGU or large GHG-emitting unit that is a 21    participant in a regional transmission organization 22    intends to retire, it must submit documentation to the 23    appropriate regional transmission organization by the 24    appropriate deadline that meets all applicable regulatory 25    requirements necessary to obtain approval to permanently 26    cease operating the large GHG-emitting unit;  HB2629- 53 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1        (2) if any EGU or large GHG-emitting unit that is a 2    participant in a regional transmission organization 3    receives notice that the regional transmission 4    organization has determined that continued operation of 5    the unit is required, the unit may continue operating 6    until the issue identified by the regional transmission 7    organization is resolved. The owner or operator of the 8    unit must cooperate with the regional transmission 9    organization in resolving the issue and must reduce its 10    emissions to zero, consistent with the requirements under 11    subsection (g), (h), (i), (j), (k), or (k-5), as 12    applicable, as soon as practicable when the issue 13    identified by the regional transmission organization is 14    resolved; and15        (3) any large GHG-emitting unit that is not a 16    participant in a regional transmission organization shall 17    be allowed to continue emitting CO2e and copollutants 18    after the zero-emission date specified in subsection (g), 19    (h), (i), (j), (k), or (k-5), as applicable, in the 20    capacity of an emergency backup unit if approved by the 21    Illinois Commerce Commission.22    (m) No variance, adjusted standard, or other regulatory 23relief otherwise available in this Act may be granted to the 24emissions reduction and elimination obligations in this 25Section.26    (n) By June 30 of each year, beginning in 2025, the Agency   HB2629- 54 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1shall prepare and publish on its website a report setting 2forth the actual greenhouse gas emissions from individual 3units and the aggregate statewide emissions from all units for 4the prior year.5    (o) Every 5 years beginning in 2025, the Environmental 6Protection Agency, Illinois Power Agency, and Illinois 7Commerce Commission shall jointly prepare, and release 8publicly, a report to the General Assembly that examines the 9State's current progress toward its renewable energy resource 10development goals, the status of CO2e and copollutant 11emissions reductions, the current status and progress toward 12developing and implementing green hydrogen technologies, the 13current and projected status of electric resource adequacy and 14reliability throughout the State for the period beginning 5 15years ahead, and proposed solutions for any findings. The 16Environmental Protection Agency, Illinois Power Agency, and 17Illinois Commerce Commission shall consult PJM 18Interconnection, LLC and Midcontinent Independent System 19Operator, Inc., or their respective successor organizations 20regarding forecasted resource adequacy and reliability needs, 21anticipated new generation interconnection, new transmission 22development or upgrades, and any announced large GHG-emitting 23unit closure dates and include this information in the report. 24The report shall be released publicly by no later than 25December 15 of the year it is prepared. If the Environmental 26Protection Agency, Illinois Power Agency, and Illinois   HB2629- 55 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1Commerce Commission jointly conclude in the report that the 2data from the regional grid operators, the pace of renewable 3energy development, the pace of development of energy storage 4and demand response utilization, transmission capacity, and 5the CO2e and copollutant emissions reductions required by 6subsection (i) or (k-5) reasonably demonstrate that a resource 7adequacy shortfall will occur, including whether there will be 8sufficient in-state capacity to meet the zonal requirements of 9MISO Zone 4 or the PJM ComEd Zone, per the requirements of the 10regional transmission organizations, or that the regional 11transmission operators determine that a reliability violation 12will occur during the time frame the study is evaluating, then 13the Illinois Power Agency, in conjunction with the 14Environmental Protection Agency shall develop a plan to reduce 15or delay CO2e and copollutant emissions reductions 16requirements only to the extent and for the duration necessary 17to meet the resource adequacy and reliability needs of the 18State, including allowing any plants whose emission reduction 19deadline has been identified in the plan as creating a 20reliability concern to continue operating, including operating 21with reduced emissions or as emergency backup where 22appropriate. The plan shall also consider the use of renewable 23energy, energy storage, demand response, transmission 24development, or other strategies to resolve the identified 25resource adequacy shortfall or reliability violation.26        (1) In developing the plan, the Environmental   HB2629- 56 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1    Protection Agency and the Illinois Power Agency shall hold 2    at least one workshop open to, and accessible at a time and 3    place convenient to, the public and shall consider any 4    comments made by stakeholders or the public. Upon 5    development of the plan, copies of the plan shall be 6    posted and made publicly available on the Environmental 7    Protection Agency's, the Illinois Power Agency's, and the 8    Illinois Commerce Commission's websites. All interested 9    parties shall have 60 days following the date of posting 10    to provide comment to the Environmental Protection Agency 11    and the Illinois Power Agency on the plan. All comments 12    submitted to the Environmental Protection Agency and the 13    Illinois Power Agency shall be encouraged to be specific, 14    supported by data or other detailed analyses, and, if 15    objecting to all or a portion of the plan, accompanied by 16    specific alternative wording or proposals. All comments 17    shall be posted on the Environmental Protection Agency's, 18    the Illinois Power Agency's, and the Illinois Commerce 19    Commission's websites. Within 30 days following the end of 20    the 60-day review period, the Environmental Protection 21    Agency and the Illinois Power Agency shall revise the plan 22    as necessary based on the comments received and file its 23    revised plan with the Illinois Commerce Commission for 24    approval.25        (2) Within 60 days after the filing of the revised 26    plan at the Illinois Commerce Commission, any person   HB2629- 57 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1    objecting to the plan shall file an objection with the 2    Illinois Commerce Commission. Within 30 days after the 3    expiration of the comment period, the Illinois Commerce 4    Commission shall determine whether an evidentiary hearing 5    is necessary. The Illinois Commerce Commission shall also 6    host 3 public hearings within 90 days after the plan is 7    filed. Following the evidentiary and public hearings, the 8    Illinois Commerce Commission shall enter its order 9    approving or approving with modifications the reliability 10    mitigation plan within 180 days.11        (3) The Illinois Commerce Commission shall only 12    approve the plan if the Illinois Commerce Commission 13    determines that it will resolve the resource adequacy or 14    reliability deficiency identified in the reliability 15    mitigation plan at the least amount of CO2e and copollutant 16    emissions, taking into consideration the emissions impacts 17    on environmental justice communities, and that it will 18    ensure adequate, reliable, affordable, efficient, and 19    environmentally sustainable electric service at the lowest 20    total cost over time, taking into account the impact of 21    increases in emissions.22        (4) If the resource adequacy or reliability deficiency 23    identified in the reliability mitigation plan is resolved 24    or reduced, the Environmental Protection Agency and the 25    Illinois Power Agency may file an amended plan adjusting 26    the reduction or delay in CO2e and copollutant emission   HB2629- 58 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1    reduction requirements identified in the plan. 2    (p) The goals of the State are to reduce greenhouse gas 3emissions from the transportation sector in the State by at 4least 80% from the 2005 level and achieve a net-zero emissions 5transportation sector, both by 2050.6        (1) An incremental goal of at least a 50% reduction in 7    greenhouse gas emissions from the transportation sector 8    below the year 2005 level by the year 2031 is hereby 9    established.10        (2) By no later than September 30, 2026, the Agency 11    shall establish greenhouse gas emissions reduction targets 12    for the State transportation sector on a 5-year or more 13    frequent basis that will achieve these goals.14        (3) The Agency shall set the first such emissions 15    reduction target for no later than 2031, shall use 2005 16    emissions as the baseline year, and shall provide that 17    each 5-year target is at least 15 percentage points lower 18    and no more than 25 percentage points lower than the 19    immediately preceding 5-year target.20        (4) The emissions reduction targets set by the Agency 21    must be by transportation mode, such as aerial transport 22    and highway transport, as the Agency deems appropriate 23    after consultation with the Department of Transportation.24        (5) The Agency, in coordination with the Department of 25    Transportation, shall adopt rules establishing policies 26    and programs necessary for the State to achieve the   HB2629- 59 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1    transportation sector greenhouse gas emissions reduction 2    goals and targets set forth in this subsection and in 3    subsection (c) of Section 2705-204 of the Department of 4    Transportation Law of the Civil Administrative Code of 5    Illinois. The rules may make changes to how the Department 6    of Transportation and MPOs plan, program, prioritize, and 7    fund transportation projects so that the State can achieve 8    the greenhouse gas emissions reduction goals and targets 9    set forth in this subsection and in subsection (c) of 10    Section 2705-204 of the Department of Transportation Law 11    of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois.12        (6) The Department of Transportation and MPOs in the 13    State shall ensure that their greenhouse gas emissions 14    reporting under Title 23, Part 490, of the Code of Federal 15    Regulations conforms to the greenhouse gas emissions 16    reduction goals and targets set forth in this subsection 17    and in subsection (c) of Section 2705-204 of the 18    Department of Transportation Law of the Civil 19    Administrative Code of Illinois. 20    (q) No later than June 30, 2026, the Agency, by rule, shall 21establish a social cost of carbon, expressed in terms of 22dollars per ton of CO2e. 23        (1) The social cost of carbon shall serve as a 24    monetary estimate of the value of not emitting a ton of 25    greenhouse gas emissions.26        (2) In developing the social cost of carbon, the   HB2629- 60 -LRB104 09342 BDA 19400 b1    Agency shall consider estimates of the social cost of 2    carbon issued or adopted by the federal government, 3    appropriate international bodies, or other appropriate and 4    reputable scientific organizations, but the social cost of 5    carbon adopted by the Agency must not be less than the 6    social cost of carbon adopted by the United States 7    Environmental Protection Agency. 8        (3) The Agency shall periodically update its estimate 9    of the social cost of carbon to reflect changes in data, 10    assumptions, and estimates, and it shall do so at least 11    once every 5 years. 12        (4) Except as otherwise provided by law, State 13    agencies shall use the social cost of carbon figure 14    established by the Agency for purposes of estimating the 15    cost associated with carbon-related emissions. 16(Source: P.A. 102-662, eff. 9-15-21; 102-1031, eff. 5-27-22.)